Hawaii statutes.
§24-3 Allowance for expenses while
traveling on official legislative business during a session within the State.
A member of the legislature whose legal residence is on the island of Oahu and
who is required to remain away from the island of the member's legal residence
but within the State overnight or longer while on official legislative business
during a session and when authorized by the presiding officer of the respective
house, shall receive an allowance to cover all personal expenses such as board,
lodging, and incidental expenses but not travel expenses. The allowance under
this section shall be set at a single rate that will:

(1) Not exceed the greater of the maximum allowance
for such expenses payable to any public officer or employee of the federal
government or the State;

(2) Be reasonably calculated to cover the expenses
specified in this section; and

(3) Be determined jointly by the president of the
senate and the speaker of the house of representatives for the legislature as a
whole. [L 1969, c 5, pt of §1; am L 1981, c 164, §1(1); am L 1983, c 80, §2; am
L 2005, c 222, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next